Utah statutes.
77-27-1.5.   Appearance by inmate, offender, or witness.
(1)  An appearance by an inmate, offender, or witness before the board, a
panel, board member, or hearing officer may be in person, through
videoconferencing or other electronic means.  Any appearance by
videoconference or other electronic means shall be recorded as provided in
Section 77-27-8.
(2)  An inmate's or offender's electronic appearance by telephone is
permissible with the consent of the inmate or offender, when the inmate or
offender is incarcerated in a facility outside of this state.
